test/src/morphology/noun-kont_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Contracted nouns, without the ones which only are in plural. Lexicon SARVES, SUOLOJ, GUOMOJ, GÅHKES, SJUOKKAJ, GISTÁ. The nouns to nomen derivations are also tested. 

Tests:
  Noun - sváles: # SARVES
    sváles+N+Sg+Nom: sváles 
    sváles+N+Sg+Gen: svállá
    sváles+N+Sg+Ill: sválláj
    sváles+N+Pl+Ill: svállájda
    sváles+N+Ess:    [svállen, sválen]
    sváles+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: svállásj
    sváles+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: svállátjasj
    sváles+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: sválládibme
    sváles+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [svállágahtes, sválládahtes]
    sváles+N+Abe: sválládak

  Noun - viepses: # SARVES
    viepses+N+Sg+Nom: viepses 
    viepses+N+Sg+Gen: væppsá
    viepses+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: væppsáma
    viepses+N+Sg+Acc: væppsáv
    viepses+N+Sg+Ine: væppsán 
    viepses+N+Sg+Ill: væppsáj
    viepses+N+Sg+Ela: væppsás
    viepses+N+Sg+Com: væppsájn 
    viepses+N+Pl+Nom: væppsá
    viepses+N+Pl+Gen: væppsáj
    viepses+N+Pl+Acc: væppsájt
    viepses+N+Pl+Ine: væppsájn
    viepses+N+Pl+Ill: væppsájda
    viepses+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: væppsájdiseda
    viepses+N+Pl+Ela: væppsájs
    viepses+N+Pl+Com: væppsáj
    viepses+N+Ess: [væppsán, viepsen]
    viepses+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: væppsásj
    viepses+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: væppsátjasj
    viepses+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: væppsádibme
    viepses+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [væppságahtes, væppsádahtes]
    viepses+N+Abe: væppsádak

  Noun - bálges: # SARVES
    bálges+N+Sg+Nom: bálges
    bálges+N+Sg+Acc: bálggáv
    bálges+N+Pl+Com: bálggáj
    bálges+N+Ess: [bálggán, bálgen]

  Noun - boadnjesasses: # SARVES
    boadnjesasses+N+Sg+Nom: boadnjesasses 
    boadnjesasses+N+Sg+Ill: boadnjesassáj 

  Noun - goabdes: # SARVES
    goabdes+N+Sg+Nom: goabdes 
    goabdes+N+Sg+Ine: goabddán
    goabdes+N+Sg+Ill: goabddáj

  Noun - ålmåj: # SUOLOJ
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Nom: ålmåj 
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Gen: ålmmå
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ålmmåma
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Acc: ålmmåv
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Ine: ålmmån 
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Ill: ålmmåj
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Ela: ålmmås
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Com: ålmmåjn 
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Nom: ålmmå
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Gen: ålmmåj
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Acc: ålmmåjt
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Ine: ålmmåjn
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Ill: ålmmåjda
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: ålmmåjdiseda
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Ela: ålmmåjs
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Com: ålmmåj
    ålmåj+N+Ess: ålmmån
    ålmåj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ålmmåsj
    ålmåj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ålmmåtjasj
    ålmåj+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: ålmmådibme
    ålmåj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [ålmmågahtes, ålmmådahtes]
    ålmåj+N+Abe: ålmmådak

  Noun - suoloj: # SUOLOJ
    suoloj+N+Sg+Nom: suoloj 
    suoloj+N+Sg+Ine: suollun
    suoloj+N+Sg+Ill: suolluj
    suoloj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: suollusj
    suoloj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: suollutjasj
    suoloj+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: suolludibme
    suoloj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [suollugahtes, suolludahtes]
    suoloj+N+Abe: suolludak

  Noun - sáttoj: # SUOLOJ
    sáttoj+N+Sg+Nom: sáttoj
    sáttoj+N+Sg+Ine: sáddun
    sáttoj+N+Sg+Ill: sádduj

  Noun - tjoavtjoj: #  SUOLOJ
    tjoavtjoj+N+Sg+Nom: tjoavtjoj
    tjoavtjoj+N+Sg+Ine: tjoaktjun
    tjoavtjoj+N+Sg+Ill: tjoaktjuj

  Noun - ænoj: # GUOMOJ
    ænoj+N+Sg+Nom: ænoj 
    ænoj+N+Pl+Nom: æddnu 
    ænoj+N+Sg+Ill: æddnuj
    ænoj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: æddnusj

  Noun - boatsoj: # GUOMOJ
    boatsoj+N+Sg+Nom: boatsoj 
    boatsoj+N+Sg+Ine: boahttsun 
    boatsoj+N+Sg+Ill: boahttsuj
    boatsoj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: boahttsusj
    boatsoj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: boahttsutjasj
    boatsoj+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: boahttsudibme
    boatsoj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [boahttsugahtes, boahttsudahtes]
    boatsoj+N+Abe: boahttsudak

  Noun - vuostoj: # GUOMOJ
    vuostoj+N+Sg+Nom: vuostoj 
    vuostoj+N+Sg+Ine: vuosstun 
    vuostoj+N+Sg+Ill: vuosstuj

  Noun - gåhkes: # GÅHKES
    gåhkes+N+Sg+Nom: gåhkes 
    gåhkes+N+Sg+Ine: gåhkkån 
    gåhkes+N+Sg+Ill: gåhkkåj
    gåhkes+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåhkkåsj
    gåhkes+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåhkkåsj
    gåhkes+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåhkkåtjasj
    gåhkes+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: gåhkkådibme
    gåhkes+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [gåhkkågahtes, gåhkkådahtes]
    gåhkes+N+Abe: gåhkkådak

  Noun - sjuokkaj: # SJUOKKAJ
    sjuokkaj+N+Sg+Nom: sjuokkaj 
    sjuokkaj+N+Sg+Ine: sjuoggán 
    sjuokkaj+N+Sg+Ill: sjuoggáj
    sjuokkaj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sjuoggásj
    sjuokkaj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sjuoggátjasj
    sjuokkaj+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: sjuoggádibme
    sjuokkaj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [sjuoggágahtes, sjuoggádahtes]
    sjuokkaj+N+Abe: sjuoggádak

  Noun - gistá: # GISTÁ
    gistá+N+Sg+Nom: gistá 
    gistá+N+Sg+Ine: gisstán 
    gistá+N+Sg+Ill: gisstáj
    gistá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gisstásj
    gistá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gisstátjasj
    gistá+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: gisstádibme
    gistá+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [gisstágahtes, gisstádahtes]
    gistá+N+Abe: gisstádak
